Alaska statutes. Title 37. Public Finance.
Article 7. Arctic Winter Games Team Alaska Trust.

Sec. 37.14.600.
Arctic Winter Games Team Alaska trust fund established.

The Arctic Winter Games Team Alaska trust fund is established as a separate endowment trust of the state consisting of

appropriations to the trust;

donations to the trust; and

income earned on investments of trust assets.

The commissioner of revenue shall manage the trust as an endowment, with the goal of ensuring that the purchasing power of the trust will not diminish over time without regard to additional contributions that may be made to the trust.

Nothing in this section creates a dedicated fund.

History.

(§ 1 ch 21 SLA 2001)

Sec. 37.14.610.
Duties of the commissioner.

The commissioner of revenue has the power and duty to

act as official custodian of the cash and investments belonging to the Arctic Winter Games Team Alaska trust by securing adequate and safe custodial facilities;

exercise the same powers and duties as those established for the Alaska Retirement Management Board in AS

37.10.220

;

invest the assets of the trust in a manner likely to yield at least five percent real rate of return over time;

maintain accounting records of the trust in accordance with investment accounting principles;

enter into and enforce contracts or agreements considered necessary for the investment purposes of the trust;

report annually to the board of directors of the Arctic Winter Games Team Alaska the condition and performance of the trust;

monitor use of trust money by the Arctic Winter Games Team Alaska; and

do all acts that the commissioner of revenue considers necessary or proper in administering the assets of the trust.

History.

(§ 1 ch 21 SLA 2001; am § 68 ch 9 FSSLA 2005)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 146, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, makes the 2005 amendment of this section retroactive to July 1, 2005.

Sec. 37.14.620.
Transfers from the trust fund.

As soon as practicable after July 1 of each year, the commissioner of revenue shall determine the average month-end market value of the Arctic Winter Games Team Alaska trust fund for the immediately preceding three fiscal years. Five percent of that amount shall be identified by the commissioner as available for appropriation to the Department of Revenue for

costs to the department of administering the trust; and

transfers to Arctic Winter Games Team Alaska, a nonprofit corporation, in amounts requested by the corporation for purposes authorized in AS

37.14.630

.

As soon as practicable after July 1 of each fiscal year that the Arctic Winter Games are held in the state, the commissioner of revenue shall determine whether more money may be made available to support the state’s participation in the games from the Arctic Winter Games Team Alaska trust fund than the amount determined under (a) of this section. The determination of the amount of additional money available shall be based on consideration of AS

37.14.600(b)

and any amounts identified during prior fiscal years as available for appropriation under (a) of this section that were never transferred from the trust fund. The additional amount shall be identified by the commissioner and is available for appropriation to the Department of Revenue for transfers to Arctic Winter Games Team Alaska.

History.

(§ 1 ch 21 SLA 2001)

Sec. 37.14.630.
Use of trust money.

The board of directors of the Arctic Winter Games Team Alaska may use money transferred from the Arctic Winter Games Team Alaska trust fund only for

equipment, uniforms, travel, and food and lodging for Arctic Winter Games Team Alaska athletes, coaches, staff, and directors;

staging tryouts for Arctic Winter Games Team Alaska in events;

costs of athletic skill clinics;

grants to youth sports organizations for equipment;

providing for cultural performers and exhibitions to accompany the Arctic Winter Games Team Alaska sports delegation;

costs incurred by the Arctic Winter Games Host Society for expenses associated with holding the Arctic Winter Games in the state; and

administrative expenses related solely to the state’s participation in the Arctic Winter Games.

History.

(§ 1 ch 21 SLA 2001)